Washington statutes.
RCWWebsite Search Term

Print

RCWs > Dispositions > Title 9 > Chapter 9.92

Chapter 9.92.050 RCW Dispositions

PUNISHMENT

Sections

9.92.050
Commitment to state reformatory.

[1955 c 246 § 1; 1909 c 249 § 25; RRS § 2277.]

Repealed by 1992 c 7 § 64.

9.92.100
Prevention of procreation.

[1909 c 249 § 35; RRS § 2287.]

Repealed by 2023 c 102 § 14.

9.92.150
Reduction for good behavior.

[1984 c 209 § 1; 1983 c 276 § 1; 1937 c 99 § 1; RRS § 10191-1.]

Repealed by 1989 c 248 § 4.